California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) The District Attorney of the County of Alameda, in collaboration with the county child welfare agency, county probation,
 sheriff, and community-based agencies, may develop, as a component of the program described in this chapter, protocols for identifying and assessing minors, upon arrest or detention by law enforcement, who may be victims of commercial sexual exploitation. The protocol shall include the process for how to make a report to the county child welfare agency if there is reason to believe the minor is a person described in Section 300. The protocol shall also include the process for the child welfare agency to investigate the report pursuant to Section 328.

(c) The District Attorney of the County of Alameda, in collaboration with the county child welfare agency, county probation, sheriff, and community-based agencies that serve commercially sexually exploited minors, may develop, as a component of the program described in this chapter, a diversion program
 reflecting the best practices to address the needs and requirements of minors who have been determined to be victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(d) The District Attorney of the County of Alameda, in collaboration with the county and community-based agencies, may form, as a component of the program described in this chapter, a multidisciplinary team including, but not limited to, city police departments, the county sheriff’s department, the public defender’s office, the probation department, child protection services, and community-based organizations that work with or advocate for commercially sexually exploited minors, to do both of the following:

(1) Develop a training curriculum reflecting the best practices for identifying and assessing minors who may be victims of commercial
 sexual exploitation.

(2) Offer and provide this training curriculum through multidisciplinary teams to law enforcement, child protective services, and others who are required to respond to arrested or detained minors who may be victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 86, Sec. 9.   (SB 357)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18259.3.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “commercially sexually exploited minor” means a person under 18 years of age who is described by one or more of the following:

(1) Has been abused in the manner described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11165.1 of the Penal Code, and who has been detained for a violation of the law or placed in civil protective custody on a safety hold based only on a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647 of the Penal Code or subdivision (a) of former Section 653.22 of the Penal Code.

(2) Has been adjudged a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 300.

(3) Has been the victim of abduction, as described in Section 267 of the Penal Code.

(4) Meets the definition of a victim of a severe form of trafficking, as defined in Section 7105 of Title 22 of the United States Code.

(b) If a minor is arrested or detained for an alleged violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647 of the Penal Code or of subdivision (a) of former Section 653.22 of the Penal Code, or if a minor is the subject of a petition to be adjudged a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 300, they shall be presumed to be a commercially sexually exploited minor, as defined in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 86, Sec. 10.   (SB 357)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.45. Child Welfare Waiver Demonstration Project [18260. - 18260.]

18260.

(a) The department may conduct a demonstration project in up to 20 counties, to allow flexible use of federal and state foster care funds by utilizing a federal capped allocation model over a five-year period, based on the terms and conditions of the federal Title IV-E waiver. Participation shall be at the option of each county, subject to state approval, provided that each county has entered into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the department, as described in subdivision (c). The department shall not be required to conduct any demonstration projects under this section if no county elects to participate. It is the intent of the Legislature that this project will improve outcomes or safety for children, and that the state shall provide immediate assistance, as needed, if the department finds that children’s health, safety, or well-being has declined, or is at risk of declining, as a result of a county’s participation in the project.

(b) The department is authorized to conduct the demonstration project in order to provide participating counties with flexibility in their use of state and federal foster care maintenance and administrative funds that were previously restricted to payment for the care and supervision of children in out-of-home placements and administrative expenditures. Any county, state, or federal savings in the foster care program that occur as a result of the demonstration project shall be reinvested by the counties in child welfare services program improvements. These foster care savings will support the counties in developing a broader and more responsive array of services that will contribute to improved outcomes for children and families. Any unexpended state and federal funds may be retained by each county for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years for purposes consistent with this section.

(c) The department shall work with county welfare directors and other stakeholders to develop the terms and conditions of the MOU. The MOU shall incorporate the terms and conditions of the federal approval of the use of federal funds for the demonstration project, additional conditions as described in this section, and provisions deemed by the department and counties as reasonably necessary to fulfill the purpose of the demonstration project and to ensure compliance with its conditions and with this section. Provisions of the MOU shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The MOU shall specify the time periods for the county’s participation in the demonstration project, and shall set forth procedures for the county to opt out of participation in the demonstration project. A county electing to opt out of the demonstration project shall provide written notice to the department of its intent to do so in accordance with the MOU.

(2) The county is responsible for ensuring that adequate funds are available to protect children at risk of abuse and neglect, by out-of-home placement or otherwise, until funds are appropriated to the county through the Budget Act, including provisional language in the Budget Act that authorizes midyear funding adjustments, for this purpose.

(3) The MOU shall specify the allocation methodology for the capped amount of federal funds that will be allocated to the county for the demonstration project, as well as the county’s share of cost.

(4) The MOU shall specify the methodology for the provision of state General Fund resources that a county shall receive under the waiver and the liability for the county and the state for costs in excess of the capped federal amount.

(d) The county and state share of costs for the demonstration project shall be determined notwithstanding Sections 15200 and 10100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 464, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Child Sexual Abuse Prevention Training Centers [18275. - 18279.5.]

18275.

The Legislature finds that there is a need to develop programs to provide the kinds of innovative strategies and services which will ameliorate, reduce, and ultimately eliminate the trauma of child sexual abuse.

The Legislature also finds that for the purposes of developing and providing these programs and services, and for the training of, and providing information to, city and county personnel throughout the state, it is necessary to expand the services provided by the child sexual abuse prevention demonstration center established pursuant to the former provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1664, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18275.5.

Unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Director” means the Director of Emergency Services.

(b) “Office” means the Office of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 539.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

18276.

The functions and goals of the program developed by the centers shall include all of the following:

(a) Provision of counseling and practical assistance by onsite professionals to sexually abused children and their families, particularly to victims of incest.

(b) Hastening, where in the interests of the child, the process of reconstitution of the family and the marriage.

(c) Marshaling and coordinating the services of all agencies responsible for the sexually abused child and his or her family, as well as other resources to ensure comprehensive, supportive case management.

(d) Employment of a model that fosters self-managed growth, rather than a medical model based on curing disease, and that avoids static theory and methods.

(e) Responding to individual physical, emotional, and social needs of clients so that supportive services are individually tailored and applied as long as necessary.

(f) Facilitation of the expansion and autonomy of self-help groups and provision of guidance to the membership, such as (1) training in cocounseling, self-management, and intrafamily communication techniques, and (2) training in locating community resources.

(g) Informing the public at large and professional agencies about the existence and supportive approach of the program with the aim of encouraging victims and offenders to seek the services of the program voluntarily.

(h) Development of informational and training materials and seminars to enable emulation or adaptation of the program by other communities, emphasizing the program’s stress on cooperation and coordination with all appropriate elements of the criminal justice system and law enforcement system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1664, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18276.5.

(a) The two centers selected pursuant to Section 18277 shall develop training programs pertaining to the prevention of and assistance to victims of child sexual abuse and their families. These programs shall be designed for the training of interagency teams of service providers and individual service providers throughout the state, including public and private personnel, who shall in turn offer that training in their communities.

(b) The department shall enter into contracts with each center providing for training and allocating training positions to each center as funds are available to pay for the tuition of individuals who attend the training programs. The contracts shall provide the same amount of funding for each center.

(c) Subject to the review of the department, the centers shall select trainees based upon the following criteria:

(1) In the first year, a minimum of ten individuals from each county shall be chosen.

(2) In subsequent years, a minimum of one-fourth of all positions shall be allocated to rural counties.

(3) When possible, distribution shall be based on the relative population of the counties in which the participants provide services.

(4) The rate of demand for services by child sexual abuse victims and their families in the county.

(5) An emphasis shall be placed on the training of teams of service providers from a geographic area, rather than on training individual service providers.

(6) The ability of the individuals chosen to duplicate the training in his or her geographic area.

(7) The ability of the individuals to apply the training as a direct service provider.

(8) A geographic dispersion of trainees throughout a county is preferred, where feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1664, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18277.

The director shall select two child sexual abuse prevention training centers, one in northern California and the other in southern California, which shall receive state funds pursuant to this chapter. The director shall give consideration to existing demonstration programs relating to the prevention of sexual abuse of children and may award grant awards on a sole source basis to the two training centers which he or she selects for funding. The office shall appraise the performance of the training centers on an annual basis and determine whether they shall receive continuation grants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 540.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

18278.

(a) The office shall make grants to community nonprofit child sexual abuse treatment programs that are unable to meet the current demand for their services, pursuant to this section.

(b) Programs seeking these grants shall apply to the Office of Criminal Justice Planning in the manner prescribed by the Office of Criminal Justice. Each award shall be limited to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). Programs shall be selected based, at a minimum, on the following criteria:

(1) The program’s inability to meet the public demand for its services.

(2) The
 program’s use of the award to maximize the services provided to clients who would not otherwise be served.

(3) The likelihood that the program will be able to maintain the new level of service after the funds granted are depleted.

The awards shall be equitably distributed to programs in northern and southern California. At least one-fourth of the funds shall be distributed to rural programs.

(c) The office shall fund programs as expeditiously as possible; program funding shall commence within 90 days after the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 541.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

18278.5.

The office shall enter into contracts with the centers for the provision of services required by this chapter within four months of the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 542.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

18279.5.

The centers may seek, receive, and make use of any funds which may be made available from federal, voluntary, philanthropic, or other sources in order to augment any state funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1664, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. Child Health and Safety Fund [18285. - 18285.5.]

18285.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Child Health and Safety Fund for the purposes specified in this section.

(b) Moneys for this fund shall be derived from the license plate program provided for pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code and from civil penalties on child daycare facility providers.

(c) Moneys in the fund shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes specified in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f).

(d) Fifty percent of moneys derived from the license plate program pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code shall be available, upon appropriation, to the State Department of
 Social Services for the purpose of administering provisions of Sections 1596.816, 1596.87, 1596.872b, 1596.893b 1596.895, 1596.95, 1597.091, 1597.54, 1597.541, 1597.542, 1597.55b and 1597.62 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, an additional five hundred one thousand dollars ($501,000), in excess of the 50 percent derived from the license plate program, also shall be made available for these purposes. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate these special funds according to the following priorities:

(1) Site visits performed pursuant to Sections 1597.091 and 1597.55b of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The monitoring responsibility of the childcare advocate program.

(3) Training for investigative and licensing field staff.

(4) Other aspects of the childcare advocate program performed pursuant to Section 1596.872b of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) The salary of the chief of the childcare licensing branch.

In order to implement the list of priorities set forth in this subdivision, and to complete implementation of subdivision (a) of Section 1596.816 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may, as necessary, fund appropriate administrative support costs.

(e) The balance of funds remaining after the appropriations specified in subdivision (d) derived from the license plate program pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code shall be available, upon appropriation, for programs that address any of the following child health and safety concerns and that are either to be
 carried out within a two-year period or whose implementation is dependent upon one-time initial funding:

(1) Child abuse prevention, except that not more than 25 percent of the moneys in this fund shall be used for this purpose. Ninety percent of the 25 percent shall be deposited in the county children’s trust fund, established pursuant to Section 18966 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the support of child abuse prevention services in the community, and 10 percent of the 25 percent shall be deposited in the State Children’s Trust Fund, established pursuant to Section 18969, for public education, training, and technical assistance.

(2) Vehicular safety, including restraint, warnings, and education programs.

(3) Drowning prevention.

(4) Playground safety standards.

(5) Pedestrian Safety.

(6) Bicycle safety.

(7) Gun safety.

(8) Fire safety.

(9) Poison control and safety.

(10) In-home safety.

(11) Childhood poisoning, including from prescription medications, lead, and other toxic substances.

(12) Sleep suffocation and sudden infant death syndrome.

(13) Children left in parked cars and children run over by cars moving forward or backward.

(14) Sports-related concussions, heat stroke, and spinal injury safety.

(f) Moneys derived from civil penalties imposed on daycare facility providers shall be made available, upon appropriation, to the State Department of Social Services exclusively for the technical assistance, orientation, training, and education of child daycare facility providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 291.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18285.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the priorities and programs set forth in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 18285 be funded and implemented in the order they are listed, and that each priority and program may be funded and implemented independently of the other priorities and programs.

(b) The Director of Motor Vehicles and the Director of Social Services shall annually make a determination whether the total annual receipts for the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plate program established pursuant to Article 8.4 (commencing with Section 5072) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code is sufficient to cover the priorities and programs described in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 18285. If sufficient funds are available to cover any of the priorities or programs described in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 18285, the department shall implement that priority or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 726, Sec. 16.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. The Domestic Violence Shelter-Based Programs Act [18290. - 18309.5.]

18290.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a present and growing need to develop innovative strategies and services to ameliorate and reduce the trauma of domestic violence. There are hundreds of thousands of persons in California who are regularly abused. In many cases, the acts of domestic violence lead to the death of one of the involved parties. Victims of domestic violence come from all socioeconomic classes and ethnic groups, though it is the poor who suffer most from domestic violence, since they have no immediate access to private counseling and shelter for themselves and their children. Children, even when they are not physically assaulted, very often suffer deep and lasting emotional effects.

The Legislature further finds and declares that there is a high incidence of death and injury sustained by law enforcement officers in the handling of domestic disturbances. Police arrests for domestic violence are low, and victims are reluctant to press charges or make citizen’s arrests. Furthermore, instances of domestic violence are considered to be the single most unreported crime in the state.

It is the intent of the Legislature to begin to explore and determine ways of achieving reductions in serious and fatal injuries to the victims of domestic violence and begin to clarify the problems, causes, and cures of domestic violence. In order to achieve these results, it is the intent of the Legislature that the state shall support projects in several areas throughout the state for the purpose of aiding victims of domestic violence by providing them a place to escape the destructive environment in an undisclosed and secured location, on a 24-hour basis, where staff meet the requirements set forth in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

It is further the intent of the Legislature to resolve conflicting interpretations as to whether county boards of supervisors have discretionary authority to fund nonshelter-based county domestic violence programs that lack any emergency or transitional shelter component, by restricting funding under this chapter to shelter-based domestic violence programs, as described in Sections 18294 and 18295. These clarifying and conforming changes are intended to be declaratory of existing law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18291.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Domestic violence” means abuse committed against an adult or a minor who is a spouse, former spouse, cohabitant, former cohabitant, or person with whom the suspect has had a child or is having or has had a dating or engagement relationship.

(b) “Cohabitant” means two unrelated adult persons living together for a substantial period of time, resulting in some permanency of relationship. Factors that may determine whether persons are cohabiting include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Sexual relations between the parties while
 sharing the same living quarters.

(2) Sharing of income or expenses.

(3) Joint use or ownership of property.

(4) Whether the parties hold themselves out as spouses.

(5) The continuity of the relationship.

(6) The length of the relationship.

(c) “Domestic violence shelter” means a shelter for domestic violence victims that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Provides shelter in an undisclosed and secured location.

(2) Provides staff that meet the requirements set forth in Section 1037.1 of
 the Evidence Code.

(3) Meets the requirements set forth in Section 18294.

(d) “Undisclosed” means a location that is not advertised or publicized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 124.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18293.

(a) In order to be eligible for funding pursuant to this chapter, a domestic violence shelter-based program shall demonstrate its ability to receive and make use of any funds available from governmental, voluntary, philanthropic, or other sources that may be used to augment any state or county funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter. Each domestic violence shelter-based program shall make every attempt to qualify the domestic violence shelter-based program for any available federal funding.

(b) No provision of this section is intended to prohibit domestic violence shelter-based programs receiving funds pursuant to this chapter from receiving additional funds from any
 other public or private source. Funds provided pursuant to this chapter shall not be used to reduce the financial support from other public or private sources.

(c) Proposed or existing domestic violence shelter-based programs that meet the requirements set forth in Section 18294, shall receive funding pursuant to this chapter upon the approval of the local board of supervisors.

(d) Funding shall be given to agencies and organizations whose primary function is to administer domestic violence shelter-based programs. Any additional fees received by Alameda County, Contra Costa County, Solano County, and the City of Berkeley at the time of issuance of a marriage license pursuant to Sections 18308, 18309, 18309.5, and 18309.6 that are in excess of the twenty-three dollar ($23) fee collected pursuant to this act, shall be available to that city or county for funding domestic violence
 programs other than domestic violence shelter-based programs.

(e) Prior to approving a domestic violence shelter-based program or programs for this funding, the board shall consult with individuals and groups that have expertise in the problems of domestic violence and in the operation of domestic violence shelter-based programs including operations of existing domestic violence shelter-based programs.

(f) Upon approving one or more domestic violence shelter-based programs for funding, the board shall direct the county treasurer to disburse moneys from the county’s domestic violence shelter-based program special fund and for funding, the board shall designate a local agency to monitor the domestic violence shelter-based program or programs. This monitoring shall include information regarding the number of persons requesting services, the number of persons receiving services
 according to the type of services provided, and the need, if any, for additional services or staffing.

(g) Programs that receive funding through this chapter shall, to the extent feasible, provide services to persons with a physical disability who are victims of domestic violence. If the program cannot provide the services, then the program’s staff, to the extent feasible, shall assist in referring the person with a physical disability to other programs and services in the community where assistance may be obtained.

(h) The process to determine eligibility of a domestic violence shelter-based program to receive funding pursuant to this chapter shall have as its primary purpose to ascertain that the program meets the service requirements of Section 18294. The process shall be expedient and shall include a mechanism for annual recertification.

(i) Funding obtained pursuant to this chapter is for the unrestricted use of a recipient domestic violence shelter-based program, and may be used for direct and indirect costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 340.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18294.

Domestic violence shelter-based programs shall provide all of the following basic services to victims of domestic violence and their children:

(a) Shelter on a 24 hours a day, seven days a week basis.

(b) A 24 hours a day, seven days a week telephone hotline for crisis calls.

(c) Temporary housing and food facilities.

(d) Psychological support and peer counseling provided in accordance with Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(e) Referrals to existing services in the community.

(f) A drop-in center that operates during normal business hours to assist victims of domestic violence who have a need for support services.

(g) Arrangements for schoolage children to continue their education during their stay at the domestic violence shelter-based program.

(h) Emergency transportation as feasible.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18295.

In addition to the services required in Section 18294, to the extent possible, and in conjunction with already existing community services, the domestic violence shelter-based programs shall provide a method of obtaining the following services for the victims of domestic violence:

(a) Medical care.

(b) Legal assistance.

(c) Psychological support and counseling.

(d) Information regarding other available social services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18296.

The staff of the domestic violence shelter-based program shall work with social service agencies, schools, and law enforcement agencies in an advocacy capacity for those served by the domestic violence shelter-based programs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18297.

The staff of each domestic violence shelter-based program shall attempt to achieve community support and acceptance of the program by advocating the program to community representatives and groups within the community.

Volunteers shall be trained and used to maximum capacity in the delivery of services. Staff and volunteers shall meet the training requirements set forth in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18298.

Inasmuch as domestic violence shelter-based programs are to serve a variety of cultural backgrounds, to the extent feasible, a portion of the domestic violence shelter-based program’s personnel shall be bilingual. An effort shall be made to recruit formerly battered persons as staff members.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18299.

A domestic violence shelter-based program shall maintain annual fiscal reports in a form to be prescribed by the Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18300.

An annual report shall be prepared by each domestic violence shelter-based program for submission to the county board of supervisors. The report shall be made available to the public upon request, and shall include all of the following elements:

(a) The total number of persons requesting services of the domestic violence shelter-based programs.

(b) The number of persons served in the domestic violence shelter-based program, by each type of service provided.

(c) A description of the social and economic characteristics of persons receiving services, by type of service provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18301.

In addition to any other provisions of law concerning the confidentiality of personal information collected by domestic violence shelters, a county shall not require a domestic violence shelter-based program to provide any information not enumerated in Section 18300, or require the disclosure of any information pertaining to the confidential location of a domestic violence shelter-based program or the location or identity of any shelter resident, employee, or volunteer. A county shall not require a method of data collection or recording, or impose any other requirement, that is inconsistent with the federal Violence Against Women Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 2261 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18304.

A county may establish a program for reducing the incidence of domestic violence in the county by establishing or funding domestic violence shelter-based programs that meet the requirements of this chapter. Geographically adjacent counties may combine their respective domestic violence shelter-based programs special funds in order to establish one or more domestic violence shelter-based programs meeting the requirements of this chapter, in order to provide services to the clients of each county that combines its funds with another county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18305.

(a) At the time of issuance of a marriage license pursuant to Section 26840 of the Government Code, twenty-three dollars ($23) of each fee paid shall be collected by the county clerk for deposit into the county domestic violence shelter-based programs special fund. The fees collected in this special fund shall be disbursed to approved domestic violence shelter-based programs on a yearly or more frequent basis commencing July 1, 1980. The funds shall be disbursed using a request for qualification (RFQ) process.

(b) The board of supervisors shall direct the county clerk to deposit twenty-three dollars ($23) of each fee into the county domestic
 violence shelter-based programs special fund. The county domestic violence shelter-based programs special fund shall fund domestic violence shelter-based programs established pursuant to Section 18304. Four dollars ($4) of each twenty-three dollars ($23) deposited into the county domestic violence shelter-based programs special fund shall be used, to the extent feasible, to support or expand domestic violence shelter-based programs to target underserved areas and populations. No more than 8 percent of the funds shall be expended for the administrative costs associated with the collection and segregation of the additional marriage license fees, administration of the county domestic violence shelter-based programs special fund, monitoring of the domestic violence shelter-based programs, and meeting the other administrative requirements imposed by this chapter. Counties that do not participate in the
 establishing or funding of domestic violence shelter-based programs pursuant to this chapter shall be entitled to retain up to 4 percent of the funds for the administrative costs associated with the collection and segregation of the additional marriage license fees and the deposit of these fees in the county domestic violence shelter-based programs special fund.

(c) The board of supervisors of a county may request, on not more than a quarterly basis, an accounting of the special fund, which shall include all of the following: 

(1) The balance of the special fund at the beginning of the request period.

(2) Deposits into the special fund in the request period, including a clear breakdown of funds deposited as a result of
 marriage license fees, funds deposited as a result of the collection of domestic violence probation fees, and funds deposited from other sources.

(3) Disbursements from the fund during the request period.

(4) The fund balance at the end of the request period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 144, Sec. 3.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18305.5.

Notwithstanding the availability of funds in either the county domestic violence programs special fund, or the availability of community resources, the county may finance domestic violence shelter-based programs as described in Sections 18294 and 18295.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18306.

The county board of supervisors shall consult with the local regional domestic violence coalition, consisting of representatives from existing domestic violence shelter-based programs, in planning for the establishment of a new domestic violence shelter-based program or for ongoing technical assistance for domestic violence shelter-based programs already in the county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18307.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 18305, a county may carry over funds deposited in a county domestic violence shelter-based programs special fund until the time that a domestic violence shelter-based program is established to serve the needs of domestic violence victims of the county. Records of these funds shall be available for public review upon request.

(b) Funds deposited in a county domestic violence shelter-based programs special fund may be used only to finance all, or one or more, basic services specified in Section 18294. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law. These funds shall be used for shelter services, and may be used for direct or indirect costs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18308.

The Contra Costa County Board of Supervisors shall direct the local registrar, county recorder, and county clerk to deposit fees collected pursuant to Section 103626 of the Health and Safety Code into a special fund. The county may retain up to 4 percent of the fund for administrative costs associated with the collection and segregation of the additional fees and the deposit of these fees into the special fund. Proceeds from the fund shall be used for governmental oversight and coordination of domestic violence and family violence prevention, intervention, and prosecution efforts among the court system, the district attorney’s office, the public defender’s office, law enforcement, the probation department, mental health, substance abuse, child welfare services, adult protective services, and community-based organizations and other agencies working in Contra Costa County in order to increase the effectiveness of prevention, early intervention, and prosecution of domestic and family violence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 857, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18309.

(a) The Alameda County Board of Supervisors shall direct the local registrar, county recorder, and county clerk to deposit fees collected pursuant to Section 26840.10 of the Government Code and Section 103627 of the Health and Safety Code into a special fund. The county may retain up to 4 percent of the fund for administrative costs associated with the collection and segregation of the additional fees and the deposit of these fees into the special fund. Proceeds from the fund shall be used for governmental oversight and coordination of domestic violence and family violence prevention, intervention, and prosecution efforts among the court system, the district attorney’s office, the public defender’s office, law enforcement, the probation department, mental health, substance abuse, child